Hawaii statutes.
§26-22 Transfer of functions. Whenever
the functions of a previously existing department, office, or other agency are
transferred to any department established by this chapter, the newly
established department shall succeed to all of the rights and powers exercised,
and all of the duties and obligations incurred by the previously existing
department, office, or agency in the exercise of the functions transferred,
whether the powers, duties, and obligations are mentioned in or granted by any
law, contract, or other document. All references in any such law, contract, or
document to the previously existing department, office, or agency in connection
with the functions transferred shall apply to the newly established department
as if the latter were specifically named in the law, contract, or document in
place of the previously existing department, office, or agency. [L Sp 1959 2d,
c 1, §31; Supp, §14A-30; HRS §26-22]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next